Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 3. Formation of Corporations.

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 158 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, § 43 et seq.

Sec. 10.06.205.
Incorporators.

One or more natural persons at least 18 years of age may act as incorporators of a corporation by signing and delivering to the commissioner an original and an exact copy of the articles of incorporation for the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.208.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation must set out

the name of the corporation;

the purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized, which may be stated to be, or to include, the transaction of any or all lawful business for which corporations may be incorporated under this chapter;

if incorporation is after March 24, 1982, the address of its initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent;

the name and address of each alien affiliate or a statement that there are no alien affiliates;

if the corporation is authorized to issue only one class of shares, the total number of shares that the corporation is authorized to issue;

if the corporation is authorized to issue more than one class of shares, or if a class of shares is to have two or more series,

the total number of shares of each class the corporation is authorized to issue, and the total number of shares of each series that the corporation is authorized to issue or of which the board is authorized to fix the number of shares;

the designation of each class, and the designation of each series or that the board may determine the designation of any series; and

the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions granted to or imposed on the respective classes or series of shares or the holders of the shares, or that the board, within any limits and restrictions stated, may determine or alter the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions granted to or imposed on a wholly unissued class of shares or a wholly unissued series of any class of shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, deleted (6)(D) and made related changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 166, SLA 1988, provides:

“(a) The provisions of AS

10.06.208

and

10.06.210

relating to the contents of articles of incorporation do not apply to domestic corporations existing on July 1, 1989 unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed stating that the corporation elects to be governed by all of the provisions of the Alaska Corporations Code (AS 10.06) not otherwise applicable to it under this Act.
If an amendment makes no change in the articles of incorporation other than conforming the statement of purposes and powers to AS

10.06.208

(2) or

10.06.210

(1)(F) or deletes references to par value or location of principal office, it may be adopted by approval of the board of directors of the corporation alone; otherwise, it shall be approved as provided in AS

10.06.504

—

10.06.506

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act.

“(b) A corporation organized and existing under the provisions of former AS 10.05 shall comply with AS

10.06.208

and

10.06.210

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, on or before July 1, 1994.”

Sec. 10.06.210.
Articles of incorporation; optional provisions.

The articles of incorporation may set out

any of the following provisions, which are not effective unless expressly provided in the articles:

a provision granting, with or without limitations, the power to levy assessments on the shares or class of shares;

a provision removing from shareholders preemptive rights to subscribe to any or all issues of shares or securities;

special qualifications of persons who may be shareholders;

a provision limiting the duration of the corporation’s existence to a specified date;

a provision restricting or eliminating the power of the board or of the outstanding shares to adopt, amend, or repeal provisions of the bylaws as provided in AS

10.06.228

;

a provision requiring, for any corporate action except as provided in AS

10.06.460

and

10.06.605

, the vote of a larger proportion or of all of the shares of a class or series, or the vote or quorum for taking action of a larger proportion or of all of the directors, than is otherwise required by this chapter;

a provision limiting or restricting the business in which the corporation may engage or the powers that the corporation may exercise or both;

a provision conferring on the holder of an evidence of indebtedness, issued or to be issued by the corporation, the right to vote in the election of directors and on any other matters on which shareholders may vote;

a provision conferring on shareholders the right to determine the consideration for which shares shall be issued;

a provision requiring the approval of the shareholders or the approval of the outstanding shares for a corporate action, even though not otherwise required by this chapter;

a provision that one or more classes or series of shares are redeemable as provided in AS

10.06.325

;

a provision that confers or imposes the powers, duties, privileges, and liabilities of directors on delegates under AS

10.06.450

;

a provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the corporation or its stockholders for monetary damages for the breach of fiduciary duty as a director; the articles of incorporation may not eliminate or limit the liability of a director for (i) a breach of a director’s duty of loyalty to the corporation or its stockholders; (ii) acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; (iii) wilful or negligent conduct involved in the payment of dividends or the repurchase of stock from other than lawfully available funds; or (iv) a transaction from which the director derives an improper personal benefit; the provisions of this subparagraph do not eliminate or limit the liability of a director for an act or omission that occurs before the effective date of the articles of incorporation or of an amendment to the articles of incorporation authorized by this subparagraph;

if the number of shares of a series is authorized to be fixed by the board, a provision authorizing the board, within the limits and restrictions stated in the articles or stated in a resolution of the board originally fixing the number of shares constituting a series, to increase or decrease, but not below the number of shares of the series then outstanding, the number of shares of a series after the issue of shares of that series; if the number of shares of a series are decreased, the shares constituting the decrease shall resume the status they had before the adoption of the resolution originally fixing the number of shares of the series;

reasonable restrictions on the right to transfer or hypothecate shares of a class or series, but a restriction is not binding on shares issued before the adoption of the restriction unless the holders of those shares voted in favor of the restriction;

the names and addresses of the persons appointed to act as initial directors;

any other provision not in conflict with this chapter for the management of the business and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including any provision that is required or permitted by this chapter to be stated in the bylaws.

History.

(am § 1 ch 148 SLA 1988; § 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 59 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 11 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of (1)(N) of this section were formerly AS 10.05.255(c) and (d), enacted by sec. 1, ch. 148, SLA 1988. Because the same legislature enacted ch. 166, SLA 1988, which enacted AS 10.06 and repealed AS 10.05, the provisions of sec. 1, ch. 148, SLA 1988 were incorporated into AS

10.06.210

(1) in 1988 to carry out legislative intent.
Minor word changes were made in the provisions to conform with the organization of this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, redesignated (1)(M) and (N) as (1)(L) and (M), substituted “subparagraph” for “paragraph” twice in (1)(M), added (1)(N) and made related and stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 166, SLA 1988, provides:

“(a) The provisions of AS

10.06.208

and

10.06.210

relating to the contents of articles of incorporation do not apply to domestic corporations existing on July 1, 1989 unless and until an amendment of the articles is filed stating that the corporation elects to be governed by all of the provisions of the Alaska Corporations Code (AS 10.06) not otherwise applicable to it under this Act.
If an amendment makes no change in the articles of incorporation other than conforming the statement of purposes and powers to AS

10.06.208

(2) or

10.06.210

(1)(F) or deletes references to par value or location of principal office, it may be adopted by approval of the board of directors of the corporation alone; otherwise, it shall be approved as provided in AS

10.06.504

—

10.06.506

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act.

“(b) A corporation organized and existing under the provisions of former AS 10.05 shall comply with AS

10.06.208

and

10.06.210

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, on or before July 1, 1994.”

Sec. 10.06.213.
Delivery of articles of incorporation.

An original and an exact copy of the articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing under AS

10.06.910

and for issuance of a certificate of incorporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.215.
Disclosure of corporate activities.

An incorporator presenting articles of incorporation under AS

10.06.213

shall deliver, with the articles, a separate statement of the codes, from the identification codes established under AS

10.06.870

, that most closely describe the activities in which the corporation will initially engage.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.218.
Effect of issuance of certificate of incorporation.

The corporate existence begins on the issuance of the certificate of incorporation. That certificate is conclusive evidence that all precedent conditions required to be performed by the incorporators have been satisfied and that the corporation has been incorporated. Issuance does not affect the right of the state to bring a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate or for involuntary dissolution of the corporation. The doctrines of de jure compliance, de facto corporations, and corporations by estoppel are abolished.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.220.
Liability for acting as nonexistent corporation.

Except as provided in (b) of this section persons who assume to act as a corporation for which there has been no issuance of a certificate of incorporation under AS

10.06.218

are jointly and severally liable for debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result of that action.

The terms of a written contract between a third party and persons acting on behalf of a corporation for which there has been no issuance of a certificate of incorporation may modify or preclude the liability created by this section.

An oral promise, agreement or understanding is not effective to modify or preclude the liability created in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.223.
Organizational meeting.

After the commencement of corporate existence by the issuance of a certificate of incorporation, an organizational meeting of either the incorporators or the board of directors named in the articles of incorporation shall be held at the call of a majority of the incorporators or directors named in the articles of incorporation for the purpose of adopting bylaws, electing directors if none have been named in the articles, electing officers, and transacting such other business as may come before the meeting. The organizational meeting may be held at a designated place, by remote communication, or at a designated place and by remote communication. The designated place may be inside or outside the state. Those calling the meeting shall give at least 20 days’ notice of the meeting by mail to each incorporator or director named. The notice shall state the time and place, if the meeting is to be held at a designated place, of the meeting, and whether the meeting will also be held by remote communication.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in the first sentence, deleted “, either inside or outside the state,” following “incorporation shall be held”, added the second sentence, rewrote the fourth sentence, which read, “The notice shall state the time and place of the meeting.”, and made stylistic and related changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.225.
Power of incorporators before directors’ election.

If initial directors have not been named in the articles of incorporation, the incorporator or incorporators may do whatever is necessary and proper to perfect the organization of the corporation until the directors are elected, including the adoption and amendment of bylaws of the corporation and the election of directors.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.228.
Bylaws: adoption, amendment or repeal.

Bylaws may be adopted, amended, or repealed either by approval of the outstanding shares or by approval of the board, except as provided in AS

10.06.230

. The articles of incorporation may restrict or eliminate the power of either the board or the outstanding shares to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, §§ 258 – 271.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, § 154 et seq.

Construction and application of provisions of articles, bylaws, statutes, or agreements restricting alienation or transfer of corporate stock.
2 ALR2d 745.

Purposes for which stockholder or officer may exercise right to examine corporate books and records.
15 ALR2d 11.

Conflict of laws as to validity and effect of corporate bylaw. 27 ALR2d 435.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors. 3 ALR3d 623.

Sec. 10.06.230.
Bylaws: number of directors and other content.

Unless a provision is contained in the articles, the bylaws must state the number of directors of the corporation or state that the number of directors may not be less than a stated number or more than a stated number, with the exact number of the directors to be fixed, within the limits specified, by approval of the board or the shareholders in the manner provided in the bylaws. If the articles provide for the number of directors, the number of directors may only be changed by an amendment to the articles.

[Repealed, § 59 ch 82 SLA 1989.]

After the issuance of shares, a bylaw specifying or changing a fixed number of directors, or the maximum or minimum number of directors or changing from a fixed to a variable board or vice versa, shall be adopted by approval of the outstanding shares.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, a bylaw or amendment of the articles of incorporation reducing the fixed or minimum number of directors to a number less than five may not be adopted if the number of votes cast against its adoption at a meeting is more than 16 2/3 percent of the outstanding shares entitled to vote.

The bylaws may contain any provision, not in conflict with law or the articles of incorporation, for the management of the business of the corporation and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including

a provision referred to in AS

10.06.210

(2), (3), or (4);

the time, for meetings held at a designated place, the place, and the manner, including by remote communication, of calling, conducting, and giving notice of meetings of shareholders, directors, and committees;

the manner of execution, revocation, and use of proxies;

the qualifications, duties, and compensation of directors; the time of their annual election; and the requirements of a quorum for directors’ and committee meetings;

the appointment and authority of committees of the board;

the appointment, duties, compensation, and tenure of officers;

the mode of determination of holders of record of the shares of the corporation;

the making of annual reports and financial statements to the shareholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 5, 59 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in (e), in the introductory language deleted “but not limited to,” at the end; in (e)(2), substituted “for meetings held at a designated place, the place, and the manner, including by remote communication,” for “place, and manner” following “the time,”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to (e) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.233.
Location and inspection of bylaws.

Each corporation shall keep at its principal executive office in this state or, if its principal executive office is not in this state, at its principal business office in this state, the original or a copy of its bylaws with amendments to date, which shall be open to inspection by the shareholders at all reasonable times during office hours. If the principal executive office of the corporation is outside this state and the corporation has no principal business office in this state, it shall upon the written request of a shareholder furnish to a shareholder a copy of the bylaws with amendments to date.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)